District of Columbia statutes.
1-1001.13

Appropriations.

There are hereby authorized to be appropriated, out of any money in the Treasury to the credit of the District of Columbia not otherwise appropriated, such sums as are necessary to carry out the purposes of this subchapter.

History

Aug. 12, 1955, 69 Stat. 704, ch. 862, § 13
Oct. 4, 1961, 75 Stat. 819, Pub. L. 87-389, § 1(21, 22, 23)
Sept. 22, 1970, 84 Stat. 854, Pub. L. 91-405, title II, § 205(3) (m), (n)
Dec. 23, 1971, 85 Stat. 793, Pub. L. 92-220, § 1(23)-(25), (27)
Aug. 14, 1974, 88 Stat. 471, Pub. L. 93-376, title VII, § 706(a)

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-1001.14.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-1317.
1973 Ed., § 1-1113.